Maryland, session 2025, SB0653.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
11–203.
(c) Except as provided in Title 12, Subtitle 4 and Title 14, [Subtitle 3]
SUBTITLES 3 AND 8 of this article and except for §§ 15–112 and 15–113 of this article, this
Division II does not apply to the Maryland Stadium Authority.
(e) (1) In this subsection, “University” means the University System of
Maryland, Morgan State University, or St. Mary’s College of Maryland.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, this Division II does
not apply to the University System of Maryland, Morgan State University, St. Mary’s
College of Maryland, or Baltimore City Community College.
(5) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (7) of this subsection, the
following provisions of Division II of this article apply to a University and to Baltimore City
Community College:
1. § 11–205 of this subtitle (“Collusion”);

SENATE BILL 653 3
2. § 11–205.1 of this subtitle (“Falsification, concealment,
etc., of material facts”);
3. § 13–219 of this article (“Required
clauses – Nondiscrimination clause”);
4. § 13–225 of this article (“Retainage”);
5. Title 14, Subtitle 3 of this article (“Minority Business
Participation”);
6. Title 14, Subtitle 7 of this article (“Certified Local Farm
and Fish Program”);
7. TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 8 OF THIS ARTICLE (“EMPLOYEE
STOCK OWNERSHIP PLAN PREFERENCE PROGRAM”);
[7.] 8. Title 15, Subtitle 1 of this article (“Procurement Contract
Administration”);
[8.] 9. § 15–226 of this article (“Policy established; timing of
payments; notice upon nonpayment; disputes; appeals”); and
[9.] 10. Title 16 of this article (“Suspension and Debarment
of Contractors”).
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (7) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 8 OF THIS ARTICLE (“EMPLOYEE STOCK
OWNERSHIP PLAN PREFERENCE PROGRAM”) APPLIES TO MORGAN STATE
UNIVERSITY, ST. MARY’S COLLEGE OF MARYLAND, AND BALTIMORE CITY
COMMUNITY COLLEGE.
(ii) (III) If a procurement violates the provisions of this subsection
or policies adopted in accordance with this subsection, the procurement contract is void or
voidable in accordance with the provisions of § 11–204 of this subtitle.
(7) Except with regard to the provisions of § 15–113 of this article,
paragraphs (3), (4), and (5) of this subsection do not apply to:
(i) procurement by a University or Baltimore City Community
College from:
1. another unit;
2. a political subdivision of the State;

SENATE BILL 653
3. an agency of a political subdivision of the State;
4. a government, including the government of another state,
of the United States, or of another country;
5. an agency or political subdivision of a government; or
6. a bistate, multistate, bicounty, or multicounty
governmental agency;
(ii) procurement by a University in support of enterprise activities
for the purpose of:
1. direct resale;
2. remanufacture and subsequent resale; or
3. procurement by the University for overseas programs; or
(iii) procurement by the University System of Maryland for:
1. services of managers to invest, in accordance with the
management and investment policies adopted by the Board of Regents of the University
System of Maryland, gift and endowment assets received by the University System of
Maryland in accordance with § 12–104(e) of the Education Article; or
2. expenditures to manage, maintain, and enhance, in
accordance with the management and investment policies adopted by the Board of Regents
of the University System of Maryland, the value of gift and endowment assets received by
the University System of Maryland in accordance with § 12–104(e) of the Education Article.
SUBTITLE 8. EMPLOYEE STOCK OWNERSHIP PLAN PREFERENCE PROGRAM.
14–801.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COVERED PROCUREMENT” MEANS A PROCUREMENT THAT IS VALUED
AT LESS THAN $80,000,000.
(C) “ESOP BIDDER” MEANS A RESPONSIBLE BIDDER WHO UTILIZES AN
EMPLOYEE STOCK OWNERSHIP PLAN APPROVED UNDER § 401(A) OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE.

SENATE BILL 653 5
(D) (C) “ESOP EVALUATION FACTOR” MEANS A PREFERENCE FOR AN
ESOP BIDDER OR ESOP OFFEROR THAT A UNIT MAY INCLUDE IN THE VALUATION
EVALUATION OF PROPOSALS.
(D) (E) (D) “ESOP OFFEROR” MEANS A RESPONSIBLE OFFEROR WHO
UTILIZES AN EMPLOYEE STOCK OWNERSHIP PLAN APPROVED UNDER § 401(A) OF
THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(E) (F) “NON–ESOP BIDDER” MEANS A RESPONSIBLE BIDDER WHO DOES
NOT UTILIZE AN EMPLOYEE STOCK OWNERSHIP PLAN APPROVED UNDER § 401(A) OF
THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(F) (G) “NON–ESOP OFFEROR” MEANS A RESPONSIBLE OFFEROR WHO
DOES NOT UTILIZE AN EMPLOYEE STOCK OWNERSHIP PLAN APPROVED UNDER §
401(A) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(G) “PERCENTAGE PREFERENCE” MEANS:
(1) THE PERCENT OF THE LOWEST RESPONSIVE BID SUBMITTED BY A
NON–ESOP BIDDER BY WHICH A RESPONSIVE BID SUBMITTED BY AN ESOP BIDDER
MAY:
(I) EXCEED THE LOWEST BID; AND
(II) BE AWARDED A COVERED PROCUREMENT CONTRACT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(2) THE PERCENT OF THE LOWEST RESPONSIVE COST PROPOSAL
SUBMITTED BY A NON–ESOP OFFEROR BY WHICH A RESPONSIVE PROPOSAL
SUBMITTED BY AN ESOP OFFEROR MAY:
(I) EXCEED THE LOWEST COST; AND
(II) BE AWARDED A COVERED PROCUREMENT CONTRACT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
(H) (E) “UNIT” MEANS THE MARYLAND STADIUM AUTHORITY, A
UNIVERSITY, OR THE BALTIMORE CITY COMMUNITY COLLEGE.
(I) (F) “UNIVERSITY” MEANS THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND,
MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY, OR ST. MARY’S COLLEGE OF MARYLAND.
14–802.

SENATE BILL 653
THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES TO A COVERED PROCUREMENT OF:
(1) THE MARYLAND STADIUM AUTHORITY;
(2) A UNIVERSITY; OR
(3) BALTIMORE CITY COMMUNITY COLLEGE.
14–803.
SUBJECT TO THE APPROVAL OF THE BOARD, EACH UNIT SHALL MAY
ESTABLISH A PERCENTAGE PREFERENCE AN EVALUATION FACTOR, NOT TO EXCEED
5% 10%.
14–804.
(A) A UNIT SHALL AWARD IF A UNIT AWARDS A COVERED PROCUREMENT
CONTRACT USING COMPETITIVE SEALED BIDS UNDER § 13–103 OF THIS ARTICLE,
THE UNIT MAY AWARD THE CONTRACT TO AN ESOP BIDDER IF THE ESOP BIDDER:
(1) SUBMITS THE LOWEST RESPONSIVE BID; OR
(2) DOES NOT SUBMIT THE LOWEST RESPONSIVE BID BUT THE
DIFFERENCE BETWEEN THE BID AND THE LOWEST RESPONSIVE BID SUBMITTED BY
A NON–ESOP BIDDER DOES NOT EXCEED THE PERCENTAGE PREFERENCE
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 14–803 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) A UNIT SHALL AWARD IF A UNIT AWARDS A COVERED PROCUREMENT
CONTRACT USING COMPETITIVE SEALED PROPOSALS UNDER § 13–104 OF THIS
ARTICLE, THE UNIT MAY AWARD THE CONTRACT TO AN ESOP OFFEROR IF THE
ESOP OFFEROR:
(1) SUBMITS THE RESPONSIVE PROPOSAL THAT IS MOST
ADVANTAGEOUS TO THE UNIT AFTER FACTORING IN THE PRICE PREFERENCE; OR
(2) DOES NOT SUBMIT THE RESPONSIVE PROPOSAL THAT IS MOST
ADVANTAGEOUS TO THE UNIT BUT THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN THAT PROPOSAL AND
THE LOWEST RESPONSIVE PROPOSAL SUBMITTED BY A NON–ESOP OFFEROR DOES
NOT EXCEED THE PERCENTAGE PREFERENCE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 14–803 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(A) A UNIT MAY INCLUDE AN ESOP EVALUATION FACTOR IN THE
TECHNICAL EVALUATION FOR A COMPETITIVE SEALED PROPOSAL UNDER § 13–104
OF THIS ARTICLE FOR A CONTRACT SUBJECT TO THIS SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 653 7
(B) AN ESOP EVALUATION FACTOR MAY BE:
(1) IF A POINT SYSTEM IS USED FOR EVALUATION OF PROPOSALS, UP
TO THE PERCENTAGE OF THE TOTAL ALLOCABLE TECHNICAL POINTS AUTHORIZED
UNDER § 14–803 OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(2) IF A POINT SYSTEM IS NOT USED FOR EVALUATION OF PROPOSALS,
RANKED IN ITS RELATIVE ORDER OF IMPORTANCE.
14–805.
(A) A CONTRACTOR THAT IS AWARDED A CONTRACT FOR A COVERED
PROCUREMENT SHALL PROVIDE TO A UNIT, AS A CONDITION OF RECEIVING THE
CONTRACT, WRITTEN VERIFICATION OF THE IRS DETERMINATION LETTER FOR THE
CONTRACTOR’S EMPLOYEE STOCK OWNERSHIP PLAN.
(B) THE WRITTEN VERIFICATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL BE PROVIDED BY A CONTRACTOR TO THE UNIT RESPONSIBLE
FOR THE PROJECT WITH THE SUBMISSION OF A BID OR PROPOSAL.
14–806.
ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2028, THE MARYLAND STADIUM AUTHORITY,
BALTIMORE CITY COMMUNITY COLLEGE, THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND,
MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY, AND ST. MARY’S COLLEGE OF MARYLAND SHALL
SUBMIT A REPORT, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, TO THE LEGISLATIVE POLICY COMMITTEE, THE SENATE BUDGET AND
TAXATION COMMITTEE, AND THE HOUSE HEALTH AND GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS
COMMITTEE, ON:
(1) THE NUMBER AND DOLLAR VALUE OF CONTRACTS AWARDED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE TO ESOP BIDDERS AND ESOP OFFERORS
DURING FISCAL YEARS 2026, 2027, AND 2028; AND
(2) THE AMOUNT OF PRICE PREFERENCE APPLIED TO ALL
CONTRACTS AWARDED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(3) AN EVALUATION OF THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE EMPLOYEE
STOCK OWNERSHIP PLAN PREFERENCE PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to
procurement contracts solicited on or before June 30, 2030.

SENATE BILL 653
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of June 30, 2030,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.